Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2057
Acupuncture; exemptions.

The provisions of the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act relating to acupuncture do not apply to:

(1) Any other health care practitioner credentialed under the Uniform Credentialing Act practicing within the scope of his or her profession;

(2) A student practicing acupuncture under the supervision of a person licensed to practice acupuncture under the Uniform Credentialing Act as part of a course of study approved by the department; or

(3) The practice of acupuncture by any person licensed or certified to practice acupuncture in any other jurisdiction when practicing in an educational seminar sponsored by a state-approved acupuncture or professional organization if the practice is supervised directly by a person licensed to practice acupuncture under the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 2001, LB 270, § 9;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 81;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,345;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 715.